Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 673.010 to
673.465.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “Post-secondary education institution” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(b) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(c) A school or division of the Oregon Health and Science University; or
(d) An Oregon-based, generally accredited,  not-for-profit private institution of higher
education.
(2) The Oregon Board of Accountancy may establish a program for  awarding grants to
organizations to fund need-based scholarships for  students seeking higher education in ac-
counting at a post-secondary education  institution that is accredited by a regional accredit-
ing association or by another accrediting body that is recognized by the board.
(3) The board may by rule establish the eligibility criteria for the grant program.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 673.425 is amended to read:
673.425. The Oregon Board of Accountancy  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. All moneys collected or  received by the Oregon Board of
Accountancy shall be deposited in  the fund. Interest earned on moneys in the fund shall be credited
to the  fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the board to provide grants un-
der section 2 of this 2025 Act  and for the administration and enforcement of ORS 673.010 to
673.465.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 796 (SB 796-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 796 (SB 796-INTRO) Page 2